Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.255

Meal charge policies.

The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall collect, analyze, and promote to school districts and applicable community-based organizations best practices in local meal charge policies that are required by the United States department of agriculture in memorandum SP 46-2016.

[ 2018 c 271 s 5.]

NOTES:

Short title—2018 c 271: See note following RCW 28A.235.250.